Tennessee, session 114, HB1392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307, is amended by deleting
subsection (g).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1313(a), is amended by
deleting "or who lawfully carries a handgun pursuant to § 39-17-1307(g)".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1392
003046
- 1 -